src/wip/czech.sbl
    define adjectives_endings as (
        do (
            [substring] R1 among (
                'sk{y'}' 'sk{y'}mi' 'sk{y'}m' '{sv}t{ev}j{sv}{i'}' '{sv}t{i'}'
                'sk{e'}' 'sk{a'}' 'skou' 'sk{y'}ch' 'sk{e'}ho' 'sk{e'}mu' 'sk{e'}m'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'sk{y'}'
                )
                'ck{y'}' '{cv}t{ev}j{sv}{i'}' 'ck{e'}' 'ck{e'}mu' 'ck{y'}mi'
                'ck{y'}ch' 'ck{y'}m' 'ck{a'}' 'ck{e'}ho' 'ck{e'}m' '{cv}t{i'}' 'ckou'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'ck{y'}'
                )
                'k{y'}' 'k{e'}ho' 'k{y'}m' 'k{e'}mu' 'k{y'}ch' 'k{e'}' 'c{i'}'
                'k{y'}mi' 'k{a'}' 'kou' 'k{e'}m'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'k{y'}'
                )
                'ch{y'}' 'ch{y'}ch' 'ch{e'}m' 'chou' 'ch{y'}m' 'ch{y'}mi'
                'ch{e'}mu' 'ch{e'}' '{sv}{sv}{i'}' 'ch{a'}' 'ch{e'}ho'
                //'{sv}{i'}'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'ch{y'}'
                )
                'h{y'}' 'h{e'}m' 'h{e'}' 'h{a'}' 'h{e'}ho' 'h{y'}ch' 'h{y'}mi'
                'hou' 'h{y'}m' 'h{e'}mu' '{zv}{sv}{i'}'
                //'z{i'}'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'h{y'}'
                )

                'r{y'}' 'r{sv}{i'}' 'r{e'}mu' 'r{y'}m' 'r{y'}mi' 'r{e'}ho' 'rou'
                '{rv}ej{sv}{i'}' 'r{a'}' 'r{y'}ch' '{rv}{i'}' 'r{e'}' 'r{e'}m'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'r{y'}'
                )
                'av{i'}'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'av{y'}'
                )

                '{i'}mu' '{i'}mi' '{i'}ho' '{i'}ch' '{i'}m'
                //'{i'}'
                (
                  delete
                  insert '{i'}'
                )

                '{u^}v' 'ov{y'}m' 'ovi' 'ovou' 'ov{y'}mi' 'ov{ev}' 'ovy' 'ovu'
                'ovo' 'ov{y'}ch' 'ova'
                (
                  delete
                  insert '{u^}v'
                )
                '{y'}' '{e'}m' '{y'}mi' 'ou' '{e'}mu' '{e'}' '{y'}ch'
                'ej{sv}{i'}' '{a'}' '{y'}m' '{e'}ho' '{ev}j{sv}{i'}'
                (
                  delete
                  insert '{y'}'
                )
                'in' 'in{y'}mi' 'ina' 'inu' 'ino' 'in{y'}ch' 'in{y'}m' 'in{ev}'
                'ini' 'inou' 'iny'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'in'
                )
                '{i'}'
                (
                  delete
                  insert '{y'}'
                )
            )
        )
    ) //adjectives_endings

    define verbs_suffixes as (
        do (
            [substring] R1 among (
                'r{a'}t' 'ovat' 'zat' 'nout' 't' 'ct' 'sit' 'et' 'sknout'
                '{ev}t' '{rv}{i'}t' 'at' 'it' 'stit' 'dit'
                (
                    //delete
                    set found_suffix
                )
            )
        )
    ) //verbs_suffixes

    define verbs_endings as (
        do (
            [substring]  among (
                'uji' 'ov{a'}no' 'ovali' 'uj{i'}ce' 'uj' 'ujete' 'ov{a'}n'
                'uju' 'ov{a'}na' 'ujou' 'ov{a'}ny' 'ovalo' 'uj{i'}c'
                'ujeme' 'ujme' 'ovala' 'ov{a'}ni' 'uj{i'}' 'uje' 'ovaly'
                'ujte' 'oval' 'uje{sv}'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'ovat'
                )
                'ere{sv}' 'ral' 'ereme' 'erouc' 'eru' 'r{a'}ny' 'ralo'
                'erete' 'rali' 'erte' 'erme' 'erouce' 'r{a'}n' 'era' 'raly'
                'r{a'}no' 'r{a'}ni' 'rala' 'er' 'ere' 'r{a'}na' 'erou'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'r{a'}t'
                )
                'jme' 'ji' 'ti' 'ouc' 'a' 'e{sv}' 'u' 'ete' 'li' 'jou' 'ouce'
                'ty' 'jte' 'j' 'je{sv}' 'ju' 'ta' 'la' 'ly' 'j{i'}ce' 'jeme'
                'eme' 'j{i'}c' 'lo' 'to' 'j{i'}' 'je' 'jete' 'ou' 'l'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 't'
                )

                '{zv}e{sv}' 'zal' '{zv}{i'}c' 'z{a'}na' 'zali' '{zv}me' '{zv}te'
                'z{a'}ni' 'zaly' 'z{a'}n' 'z{a'}no' '{zv}{i'}ce' '{zv}ou'
                '{zv}eme' '{zv}u' '{zv}ete' 'zala' 'z{a'}ny' '{zv}e' '{zv}' 'zalo'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'zat'
                )
                'ne' 'nuv' 'nouc' 'nou' '{nv}te' 'av{sv}i' 'na' 'nuli' 'neme'
                'av{sv}e' 'ato' 'n{ev}me' 'ne{sv}' '{nv}me' '{nv}' 'nu' 'av'
                'nuv{sv}i' 'nulo' 'nul' 'nuto' 'ati' 'nuly' 'ni' 'aty' 'nut'
                'n{ev}te' 'nuti' 'nuta' 'nete' 'nuty' 'nula' 'at' 'nouce' 'ata'
                'nuv{sv}e'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'nout'
                )
                '{cv}ete' '{cv}' 'ka' '{cv}eni' 'kouce' 'kla' 'kly' '{cv}ena'
                '{cv}e{sv}' 'kouc' '{cv}ou' '{cv}u' 'klo' '{cv}te' '{cv}e'
                '{cv}eny' '{cv}eme' 'kl' '{cv}me' '{cv}en' '{cv}eno' 'kli'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'ct'
                )
                'sily' '{sv}eni' 'se' 's{i'}m' 'sil' '{sv}ena' 's{i'}' 's{i'}c'
                's{i'}{sv}' 'ste' '{sv}eny' 's' 'sili' 'sila' '{sv}eno' '{sv}en'
                's{i'}me' 's{i'}te' 'sme' 's{i'}ce' 'silo'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'sit'
                )
                'ely' 'eje' 'ela' 'elo' 'eli' 'ej{i'}' 'ej{i'}c' 'ej{i'}ce' 'el'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'et'
                )
                'sknete' 'skni' 'sknouc' 'skla' 'sknuty' 'sklo' 'sknuto'
                'skne{sv}' 'sknouce' 'skneme' 'skne' 'skn{ev}me' 'skna' 'skly'
                'sknou' 'skn{ev}te' 'sknut' 'sknu' 'skli' 'sknuti' 'sknuta' 'skl'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'sknout'
                )
                '{ev}ni' '{ev}l' '{ev}' '{ev}li' '{ev}ly' '{ev}ny' '{ev}na'
                '{ev}lo' '{ev}n' '{ev}no' '{ev}la'
                (
                  delete
                  insert '{ev}t'
                )
                '{rv}e{sv}' '{rv}el' '{rv}eni' '{rv}ely' '{rv}eli' '{rv}i'
                '{rv}e' 'rouce' '{rv}eny' '{rv}u' '{rv}ena' 'ra' '{rv}ou' 'rouc'
                '{rv}eno' '{rv}elo' '{rv}ete' '{rv}en' '{rv}ela' '{rv}eme'
                (
                  delete
                  insert '{rv}{i'}t'
                )
                '{a'}te' '{a'}' '{a'}ni' '{a'}n' 'aj{i'}' 'aj{i'}c' '{a'}na'
                '{a'}m' '{a'}ny' 'aje' '{a'}{sv}' '{a'}no' '{a'}me' 'aj{i'}ce'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'at'
                )
                'ila' '{zv}eno' 'z{i'}' 'z{i'}c' 'ze' 'zila' 'z{i'}m' 'z{i'}me'
                'z{i'}ce' 'z' 'zilo' '{zv}eny' 'zte' 'ili' 'ily' 'z{i'}te'
                'zili' 'il' 'zil' 'zme' 'ilo' '{zv}ena' '{zv}en' 'z{i'}{sv}'
                'zily' '{zv}eni'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'zit'
                )
                'st{ev}ny' 'st{ev}me' 'st{ev}n' 'stily' 'st{i'}c' 'stila'
                'st{ev}ni' 'stili' 'st{i'}' 'st{ev}na' 'st{ev}te' 'st{i'}{sv}'
                'st{i'}m' 'st{i'}te' 'st{i'}me' 'st{ev}no' 'st{i'}ce' 'st{ev}'
                'stilo' 'sti' 'stil'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'stit'
                )
                'd{i'}me' 'd{i'}' 'd{i'}m' 'zen' 'zeno' 'd{i'}te' 'dily' 'dil'
                'dilo' 'd{i'}c' '{dv}me' 'd{i'}{sv}' 'dili' 'zeni' 'd{i'}ce'
                'zena' '{dv}' 'zeny' 'dila' 'd{ev}' '{dv}te'
                (
                  delete
                  insert 'dit'
                )

                'eny' 'me' 'ejme' '{sv}t{ev}ni' 'al' '{sv}t{ev}no' '{i'}m' 'ali'
                '{i'}me' '{i'}ce' 'en' '{sv}t{ev}n' '{sv}t{ev}na' 'aly' '{i'}te'
                'ena' 'ejte' 'ala' 'eni' 'eno' 'alo' '{i'}{sv}' '{sv}t{ev}ny'
                'ej' '{i'}c' 'te'
                (
                  delete
                )
            )
        )
    ) //verbs_endings

    define adverbs_suffixes as (
        do (
            [substring] R1 among (
                'ky' 'mo' 'si' 'koli' 'koliv' 'hle'
                (
                    delete
                    set found_suffix
                )
            )
        )
    )

    define end_vowel as (
        [vowel] <- ''
        [vowel] <- ''
    )

    define alternance_i as (
        (['{cv}'] <- 'k') or (['{sv}'] <- 'ch')
    )

    define end_double as (
        test substring among(
            'bb' 'dd' 'ff' 'gg' 'mm' 'nn' 'pp' 'rr' 'tt'
            ([next]  delete)
        )
    )


)//backwardmode

define stem as (
    exception or
    not hop 4 or (
        do mark_regions
        unset found_suffix
        backwards (
            do nouns_suffixes
            found_suffix or do nouns_endings
            found_suffix or do nouns_suffixes

            found_suffix or do adjectives_suffixes
            found_suffix or do adjectives_endings
            found_suffix or do adjectives_suffixes

            found_suffix or adverbs_suffixes

            //found_suffix or do verbs_suffixes
            found_suffix or do verbs_endings
            found_suffix or do verbs_suffixes

            do end_double
            do end_vowel
            do end_double
        )
    )
    do postlude
)
